Alabama, session 2026rs, HB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
24 Section 1. PAY INCREASES, FY 2026-2027. The State
25 Budget Officer shall allocate to the State Board of Education,
26 the Board of Trustees of the Alabama Institute for Deaf and
27 Blind, the Board of Youth Services School District, the Board
28 of Directors of the Alabama School of Fine Arts, the Board of
Page 1

of Directors of the Alabama School of Fine Arts, the Board of
HB239 Enrolled
29 Directors for the Alabama School of Cyber Technology and
30 Engineering, the Board of Trustees of the Alabama School of
31 Mathematics and Science, the Board of Trustees of the Alabama
32 School of Healthcare Sciences and for disbursement to the
33 employees thereof funds based on the criteria established in
34 this act. It is not the intent of this act to make
35 appropriations, but the appropriations required by this act
36 shall be made in the annual Education Trust Fund budget act
37 for the designated fiscal year.
38 (1) Certificated Personnel (K-12). For the fiscal year
39 beginning October 1, 2026, and each year thereafter, each
40 certificated employee at all city and county school systems
41 and the teachers at the Department of Youth Services School
42 District shall receive a two percent salary increase. Each
43 step and cell on the State Minimum Salary Schedule contained
44 in the annual budget act for the public schools shall be
45 increased by the amounts below for fiscal year 2026-2027, the
46 State Minimum Salary Schedule shall reflect the following
47 percentage increase:
48
49 Years of Experience Increase
50 0 2.00%
51 1 2.00%
52 2 2.00%
53 3 2.00%
54 4 2.00%
55 5 2.00%
56 6 2.00%
Page 2

6 2.00%
HB239 Enrolled
57 7 2.00%
58 8 2.00%
59 9 2.00%
60 10 2.00%
61 11 2.00%
62 12 2.00%
63 13 2.00%
64 14 2.00%
65 15 2.00%
66 16 2.00%
67 17 2.00%
68 18 2.00%
69 19 2.00%
70 20 2.00%
71 21 2.00%
72 22 2.00%
73 23 2.00%
74 24 2.00%
75 25 2.00%
76 26 2.00%
77 27 2.00%
78 28 2.00%
79 29 2.00%
80 30 2.00%
81 31 2.00%
82 32 2.00%
83 33 2.00%
84 34 2.00%
Page 3

34 2.00%
HB239 Enrolled
85 35 2.00%
86
87 All certificated employees, including the Adult Basic
88 Education and Science in Motion employees, shall be guaranteed
89 pay increases in the amounts indicated above for their years
90 of experience and degrees earned and the corresponding pay
91 increases shall be reflected in the appropriate local salary
92 schedule and paid to each certificated employee. The
93 provisions and requirements of this act shall be in addition
94 to the provisions of Section 16-13-231.1, Code of Alabama
95 1975, relating to the State Minimum Salary Schedule. Each
96 certificated employee shall be properly placed on the local
97 salary schedule according to degree earned and years of public
98 education service (either in-state or out-of-state), which
99 shall be not less than the amounts appropriated for the State
100 Minimum Salary Schedule. The employee shall be paid according
101 to degree earned and length of public education experience.
102 The pay increase shall be given to each person employed for
103 the 2026-2027 fiscal year in addition to any state or local
104 step increase to which the employee is otherwise entitled. The
105 local board of education shall transmit to the State
106 Department of Education the appropriate notice of the earned
107 advanced degree for each employee in a timely fashion;
108 thereafter, the employee shall be paid for the advanced degree
109 as soon as the degree is certified to the State Department of
110 Education as being earned.
111 (2) Education Support Personnel (K-12). A two percent
112 pay increase, beginning with the fiscal year 2026-2027, shall
Page 4

pay increase, beginning with the fiscal year 2026-2027, shall
HB239 Enrolled
113 be paid to each public education support worker and adult bus
114 driver, including Adult Basic Education and Science in Motion
115 personnel, employed for the 2026-2027 fiscal year in addition
116 to the salary received during the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
117 except employees covered under the state Merit System at the
118 Department of Youth Services School District. Each governing
119 body or authority shall establish and maintain a salary
120 schedule for each class and type of employee and each step of
121 each salary schedule shall be increased to reflect a two
122 percent pay increase beginning with fiscal year 2026-2027,
123 which shall be given to the person employed full-time for the
124 2026-2027 fiscal year and each year employed full-time
125 thereafter. The base rate of pay for part-time support
126 employees shall be increased by two percent beginning with
127 fiscal year 2026-2027. A separate local salary schedule shall
128 be established and maintained for each specific job performed.
129 (3) AIDB. For the fiscal year 2026-2027, employees at
130 the Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind shall receive a pay
131 increase that shall be in excess of their salaries received
132 during the 2025-2026 fiscal year. The increase shall be as
133 follows:
134 a. Certificated. The salary schedule for certificated
135 employees shall be revised to reflect at least the following
136 percentage increase beginning with the fiscal year 2026-2027:
137
138 Step Years of Experience Increase
139 1 Less than 3 2.00%
140 2 3 but less than 6 2.00%
Page 5

2 3 but less than 6 2.00%
HB239 Enrolled
141 3 6 but less than 9 2.00%
142 4 9 but less than 12 2.00%
143 5 12 but less than 15 2.00%
144 6 15 but less than 18 2.00%
145 7 18 but less than 21 2.00%
146 8 21 or greater 2.00%
147 9 24 but less than 27 2.00%
148 10 27 or more 2.00%
149
150 b. Education Support Personnel (K-12). A two percent
151 pay increase, beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year, shall
152 be given to each support worker employed full-time by the
153 Alabama Institute for Deaf and Blind. A separate local salary
154 schedule shall be established and maintained for each specific
155 job performed. The pay increase in this act shall be
156 incorporated into the support employees' salary schedules. The
157 base rate of pay for part-time support employees shall be
158 increased by two percent for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
159 c. Miscellaneous Requirements. The AIDB board shall
160 establish and maintain a salary schedule for each class and
161 type of employee and each step of each salary schedule for
162 fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be increased to reflect the pay
163 increase above to be given to each person employed for the
164 2026-2027 fiscal year and each year employed thereafter. The
165 pay increase contained in this subsection shall be paid to
166 each employee.
167 (4) Two-Year Postsecondary Institutions. The Board of
168 Trustees of the Alabama Community College System shall revise
Page 6

Trustees of the Alabama Community College System shall revise
HB239 Enrolled
169 all salary schedules of the two-year postsecondary
170 institutions to reflect an increase of two percent for the
171 2026-2027 fiscal year. The pay increase shall be given to each
172 person employed in addition to any step increase to which the
173 employee is otherwise entitled. The Alabama Community College
174 System shall take proper steps to ensure that employees on all
175 salary schedules are given full credit for prior work
176 experience in the public schools and colleges, and shall take
177 care to ensure proper placements on the salary schedules.
178 Placement on the revised salary schedules shall be in
179 accordance with the employee's length of service in public
180 education. No pay increase shall be given to any two-year
181 postsecondary employee in excess of two percent, except as
182 specifically provided in this act.
183 (5) Miscellaneous provisions. The following provisions
184 are hereby established:
185 a. Fiscal Year. All salaries and salary increases that
186 are established by the State Board of Education shall be paid
187 in full to each person employed before the end of the
188 applicable fiscal year as defined in Section 16-1-1 of the
189 Code of Alabama 1975, as amended.
190 b. Extended Work. Public K-12 school employees on
191 contracts that extend beyond 187 days, or the hourly
192 equivalent thereof, shall be given a pro rata salary increment
193 for each or partial day of work extending beyond 187 days.
194 c. Local Increment. Any cost-of-living adjustment
195 and/or increase on the State Minimum Salary Schedule for
196 teachers as provided in this act shall be exclusive of any
Page 7

teachers as provided in this act shall be exclusive of any
HB239 Enrolled
197 local pay increase granted or due to teachers under provisions
198 of any local salary schedule. Any cost-of-living adjustment
199 and/or pay increase required by this act for public school
200 support personnel shall be in addition to any pay increase due
201 or granted to the employee under provisions of any local
202 salary schedules. The pay increase provisions of this act
203 shall not apply to any salary supplements granted by local
204 boards of education, bonuses earned for certification by the
205 National Board of Professional Teaching Standards, or the
206 federal portion of the salary paid to a Junior Reserve Officer
207 Training Corps (JROTC) instructor employed by a local school
208 board.
209 d. Community Education. Each county and city board of
210 education shall have the option to exclude from the provisions
211 of this act any part-time employees of community education or
212 school-sponsored child care or child enrichment program that
213 is supplemental to the state-required educational program.
214 e. Local Chief Executive Officers. The pay increase
215 provisions of this act shall not apply to superintendents of
216 education of any school system or institution. Any pay
217 increase given to the superintendent shall be by majority
218 recorded vote of the governing body or authority.
219 Section 2. The pay increase granted in Section 1 of
220 this act shall begin in fiscal year 2026-2027 and continue in
221 subsequent years. Nothing in this act shall authorize
222 additional pay increases in subsequent years.
223 Section 3. (a) There is provided for fiscal year
224 2026-2027 a funded one-time, lump-sum payment, hereinafter
Page 8

2026-2027 a funded one-time, lump-sum payment, hereinafter
HB239 Enrolled
225 referred to as "longevity bonus payment," to each individual
226 whose effective date of retirement for purposes of receiving
227 benefits from the Teachers' Retirement System is prior to May
228 1, 2026, and is receiving, or is entitled to receive, a
229 monthly allowance from the Teachers' Retirement System on
230 September 30, 2026.
231 (b) The formula for calculating the longevity bonus
232 payment shall be one dollar ($1) per month for each year of
233 service attained by the retiree.
234 (c) Beneficiaries of deceased members or deceased
235 retirees, if the beneficiary is receiving or is entitled to
236 receive a monthly allowance from the Teachers' Retirement
237 System on September 30, 2026, shall receive a longevity bonus
238 payment of one dollar ($1) per month for each year of service
239 of the deceased member or deceased retiree.
240 (d) For purposes of this section, service includes the
241 service under Section 16-25-1 and Article 9, commencing with
242 Section 16-25-150, Chapter 25, Title 16, Code of Alabama 1975.
243 (e) Any individual who received benefits under the
244 Medicaid program, and whose eligibility for Medicaid benefits
245 would be impaired by the longevity bonus payment provided by
246 this section, shall not be entitled to receive the
247 aforementioned increase. Any individual who subsequently
248 applies for benefits under the Medicaid program, and that
249 individual's eligibility to receive benefits is impaired by
250 the longevity bonus payment provided by this section, shall
251 not be entitled to receive the increase subsequent to the date
252 that the member files application for benefits under the
Page 9

that the member files application for benefits under the
HB239 Enrolled
253 Medicaid program.
254 (f) The longevity bonus payments provided under this
255 section shall be paid to all eligible recipients by the
256 Teachers' Retirement System in October 2026.
257 (g) It is not the intent of this act to make
258 appropriations, but the amount required to pay the cost of the
259 lump-sum payments provided under Section 3 of this act shall
260 be appropriated to the Teachers' Retirement System in HB238 of
261 the 2026 Regular Session.
262 Section 4. The provisions of this act are severable. If
263 any part of this act is declared invalid or unconstitutional,
264 that declaration shall not affect the part that remains.
265 Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
266 1, 2026.
Page 10

1, 2026.
HB239 Enrolled
267
268
269
270
271
272
273
274
275
276 ________________________________________________
277 Speaker of the House of Representatives
278
279
280
281 ________________________________________________
282 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
283
284
285 House of Representatives
286
287 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
288 was passed by the House 12-Mar-26.
289
290 John Treadwell
291 Clerk
292
293
294
295
296
297 Senate 02-Apr-26 Amended and Passed
298
299 House 07-Apr-26 Concurred in Senate
300 Amendment
301
302
Page 11